tex/context/patterns/lang-pl.pat
\patterns {
.[cacute][cacute]8
.[cacute][lstroke]8
.[cacute][nacute]8
.[cacute][sacute]8
.[cacute][zacute]8
.[cacute][zdotaccent]8
.[cacute]8
.[cacute]b8
.[cacute]c8
.[cacute]d8
.[cacute]f8
.[cacute]g8
.[cacute]h8
.[cacute]j8
.[cacute]k8
.[cacute]l8
.[cacute]m8
.[cacute]n8
.[cacute]p8
.[cacute]r8
.[cacute]s8
.[cacute]t8
.[cacute]v8
.[cacute]w8
.[cacute]wier2[cacute]3
.[cacute]x8
.[cacute]z8
.[lstroke][cacute]8
.[lstroke][lstroke]8
.[lstroke][nacute]8
.[lstroke][sacute]8
.[lstroke][zacute]8
.[lstroke][zdotaccent]8
.[lstroke]8
.[lstroke]b8
.[lstroke]c8
.[lstroke]d8
.[lstroke]f8
.[lstroke]g8
.[lstroke]h8
.[lstroke]j8
.[lstroke]k8
.[lstroke]l8
.[lstroke]m8
.[lstroke]n8
.[lstroke]p8
.[lstroke]r8
.[lstroke]s8
.[lstroke]t8
.[lstroke]v8
.[lstroke]w8
.[lstroke]x8
.[lstroke]z8
.[nacute][cacute]8
.[nacute][lstroke]8
.[nacute][nacute]8
.[nacute][sacute]8
.[nacute][zacute]8
.[nacute][zdotaccent]8
.[nacute]8
.[nacute]b8
.[nacute]c8
.[nacute]d8
.[nacute]f8
.[nacute]g8
.[nacute]h8
.[nacute]j8
.[nacute]k8
.[nacute]l8
.[nacute]m8
.[nacute]n8
.[nacute]p8
.[nacute]r8
.[nacute]s8
.[nacute]t8
.[nacute]v8
.[nacute]w8
.[nacute]x8
.[nacute]z8
.[sacute][cacute]8
.[sacute][lstroke]8
.[sacute][nacute]8
.[sacute][sacute]8
.[sacute][zacute]8
.[sacute][zdotaccent]8
.[sacute]8
.[sacute]b8
.[sacute]c8
.[sacute]d8
.[sacute]f8
.[sacute]g8
.[sacute]h8
.[sacute]j8
.[sacute]k8
.[sacute]l8
.[sacute]m8
.[sacute]n8
.[sacute]p8
.[sacute]r[oacute]2d5
.[sacute]r[oacute]dr2
.[sacute]r8
.[sacute]s8
.[sacute]t8
.[sacute]v8
.[sacute]w8
.[sacute]wiat[lstroke]o3w2
.[sacute]x8
.[sacute]z8
.[zacute][cacute]8
.[zacute][lstroke]8
.[zacute][nacute]8
.[zacute][sacute]8
.[zacute][zacute]8
.[zacute][zdotaccent]8
.[zacute]8
.[zacute]b8
.[zacute]c8
.[zacute]d[zacute]8
.[zacute]d8
.[zacute]f8
.[zacute]g8
.[zacute]h8
.[zacute]j8
.[zacute]k8
.[zacute]l8
.[zacute]m8
.[zacute]n8
.[zacute]p8
.[zacute]r8
.[zacute]s8
.[zacute]t8
.[zacute]v8
.[zacute]w8
.[zacute]x8
.[zacute]z8
.[zdotaccent][cacute]8
.[zdotaccent][lstroke]8
.[zdotaccent][nacute]8
.[zdotaccent][sacute]8
.[zdotaccent][zacute]8
.[zdotaccent][zdotaccent]8
.[zdotaccent]8
.[zdotaccent]b8
.[zdotaccent]c8
.[zdotaccent]d8
.[zdotaccent]f8
.[zdotaccent]g8
.[zdotaccent]h8
.[zdotaccent]j8
.[zdotaccent]k8
.[zdotaccent]l8
.[zdotaccent]m8
.[zdotaccent]n8
.[zdotaccent]p8
.[zdotaccent]r8
.[zdotaccent]s8
.[zdotaccent]t8
.[zdotaccent]v8
.[zdotaccent]w8
.[zdotaccent]x8
.[zdotaccent]z8
.a2b2s3t
.a2d3
.ad4a
.ad4e
.ad4i
.ad4o
.ad4u
.ad4y
.ad5apt
.ad5iu
.ad5op
.ad5or
.ae3ro
.aeroa2
.aeroe2
.aeroi2
.aeroo2
.aerou2
.antya2
.antye2
.antyi2
.antyo2
.antyu2
.arcy3[lstroke]2
.arcy3b2
.arcy3bz2
.arcy3k2
.arcy3m2
.arcya2
.arcye2
.arcyi2
.arcyo2
.arcyu2
.au3g2
.au3k2
.au3t2
.auto3ch2
.autoa2
.autoe2
.autoi2
.autoo2
.autotran2s3
.autou2
.b[cacute]8
.b[lstroke]8
.b[nacute]8
.b[sacute]8
.b[zacute]8
.b[zdotaccent]8
.b8
.bb8
.bc8
.bd8
.be2z3
.be3z4an
.be3z4ec
.be3z4ik
.bezch2
.bezm2
.bezo2
.bezo2b1j
.bezw2
.bezzw2
.bf8
.bg8
.bh8
.bj8
.bk8
.bl8
.bm8
.bn8
.bp8
.br8
.brz8
.bs8
.bt8
.bv8
.bw8
.bx8
.bz8
.c[cacute]8
.c[lstroke]8
.c[nacute]8
.c[sacute]8
.c[zacute]8
.c[zdotaccent]8
.c8
.ca[lstroke]o3[sacute]2
.ca[lstroke]o3k2
.cb8
.cc8
.cd8
.cf8
.cg8
.ch8
.chrz8
.cienko3w2
.ciep[lstroke]o3kr2
.cj8
.ck8
.cl8
.cm8
.cn8
.cp8
.cr8
.cs8
.ct8
.cv8
.cw8
.cx8
.cz8
.czarno3k2
.czk8
.cztere2ch3
.czterechse2t3
.cztero3[sacute]2
.czw[oacute]2r3
.czw[oacute]3r4[aogonek]
.czw[oacute]3r4[eogonek]
.czw[oacute]3r4a
.czw[oacute]3r4e
.czw[oacute]3r4o
.d[cacute]8
.d[lstroke]8
.d[lstroke]ugo3tr2
.d[lstroke]ugo3w2
.d[nacute]8
.d[sacute]8
.d[zacute]8
.d[zdotaccent]8
.d8
.daleko3w2
.db8
.dc8
.dd8
.de2z3
.de3z4a3bil
.de3z4a3wu
.de3z4el
.de3z4er
.de3z4y
.deza2
.dezo2
.df8
.dg8
.dh8
.dj8
.dk8
.dl8
.dm8
.dn8
.do3[cacute]2
.do3[lstroke]2
.do3[sacute]2
.do3[zacute]2
.do3[zdotaccent]2
.do3b2
.do3c2
.do3d2
.do3f2
.do3g2
.do3h2
.do3k2
.do3l2
.do3m2
.do3p2
.do3r2
.do3s2
.do3t2
.do3w2
.do3z2
.do4[lstroke]3k
.do4k3t
.do4l3n
.do4m3k
.do4r3s
.do4w3c
.do5m4k2n
.dobr2
.dobrz2
.doch2
.docz2
.dod[zacute]2
.dod[zdotaccent]2
.dodz2
.dogrz2
.dopch2
.doprz2
.dor[zdotaccent]2
.dorz2
.dosch2
.dosm2
.dosz2
.dotk2
.dotr2
.dp8
.dr8
.drogo3w2
.drz8
.ds8
.dt8
.dv8
.dw[oacute]2j3
.dw[oacute]3j4[aogonek]
.dw[oacute]3j4[eogonek]
.dw[oacute]3j4a
.dw[oacute]3j4e
.dw[oacute]3j4o
.dw8
.dx8
.dy2s3
.dy2z3
.dy3s4e
.dy3s4o
.dy3s4ta
.dy3s4y
.dy3sz
.dy3z4e
.dyzu2
.dz8
.dziesi[eogonek]cio3[sacute]2
.dziewi[eogonek][cacute]se2t3
.dziewi[eogonek]2[cacute]3
.dziewi[eogonek]cio3[sacute]2
.e2k2s3
.e2m3e2s5ze2t
.e2s1e2s1ma
.e2s1ha
.e2s1t
.egoa2
.egoe2
.egoi2
.egoo2
.egou2
.eks4y
.elektroa2
.elektroe2
.elektroi2
.elektroo2
.elektrou2
.f[cacute]8
.f[lstroke]8
.f[nacute]8
.f[sacute]8
.f[zacute]8
.f[zdotaccent]8
.f8
.fb8
.fc8
.fd8
.ff8
.fg8
.fh8
.fj8
.fk8
.fl8
.fm8
.fn8
.fp8
.fr8
.fs8
.ft8
.fv8
.fw8
.fx8
.fz8
.g[cacute]8
.g[lstroke]8
.g[nacute]8
.g[sacute]8
.g[zacute]8
.g[zdotaccent]8
.g8
.gb8
.gc8
.gd8
.ge2o3
.gf8
.gg8
.gh8
.gj8
.gk8
.gl8
.gm8
.gn8
.go2u3
.gp8
.gr8
.grubo3w2
.grz8
.gs8
.gt8
.gv8
.gw8
.gx8
.gz8
.h[cacute]8
.h[lstroke]8
.h[nacute]8
.h[sacute]8
.h[zacute]8
.h[zdotaccent]8
.h8
.hb8
.hc8
.hd8
.hf8
.hg8
.hh8
.hipe2r3
.hipe3r4o
.hipera2
.hipere2
.hj8
.hk8
.hl8
.hm8
.hn8
.hp8
.hr8
.hs8
.ht8
.hv8
.hw8
.hx8
.hz8
.i2n3
.i2s3l
.i3n4ic
.i3n4o
.i3n4u
.i4n5o2k
.in4f3lan
.ino3w2
.izoa2
.izoe2
.izoi2
.izoo2
.izou2
.j[cacute]8
.j[lstroke]8
.j[nacute]8
.j[sacute]8
.j[zacute]8
.j[zdotaccent]8
.j8
.jad[lstroke]o3w2
.jb8
.jc8
.jd8
.jf8
.jg8
.jh8
.jj8
.jk8
.jl8
.jm8
.jn8
.jp8
.jr8
.js8
.jt8
.jv8
.jw8
.jx8
.jz8
.k[cacute]8
.k[lstroke]8
.k[nacute]8
.k[sacute]8
.k[zacute]8
.k[zdotaccent]8
.k8
.kb8
.kc8
.kd8
.kf8
.kg8
.kh8
.kilkuse2t3
.kilkuseto2
.kj8
.kk8
.kl8
.km8
.kn8
.ko[lstroke]o3w2
.kon2t2r3
.kon3tr4a
.kon3tr4e
.kon3tr4o3l
.kon3tr4o3w
.kon3tr4y
.kon4tr5a2gi
.kon4tr5a2se
.kon4tr5a2sy
.kon4tr5a2ta
.kon4tr5adm
.kon4tr5akc
.kon4tr5alt
.kon4tr5arg
.kontro2
.kontru2
.kp8
.kr[oacute]tko3tr2
.kr[oacute]tko3w2
.kr8
.kro2[cacute]3
.krz8
.ks8
.kt8
.kv8
.kw8
.kx8
.kz8
.l[cacute]8
.l[lstroke]8
.l[nacute]8
.l[sacute]8
.l[zacute]8
.l[zdotaccent]8
.l8
.lb8
.lc8
.ld8
.lf8
.lg8
.lh8
.lj8
.lk8
.ll8
.lm8
.ln8
.lp8
.lr8
.ls8
.lt8
.ludo3w2
.lv8
.lw8
.lx8
.lz8
.m[cacute]8
.m[lstroke]8
.m[nacute]8
.m[sacute]8
.m[zacute]8
.m[zdotaccent]8
.m8
.mb8
.mc8
.md8
.mf8
.mg8
.mh8
.mili3amp
.mj8
.mk8
.ml8
.mm8
.mn8
.mo[zdotaccent]no3w2
.mp8
.mr8
.ms8
.mt8
.mv8
.mw8
.mx8
.mz8
.n[cacute]8
.n[lstroke]8
.n[nacute]8
.n[sacute]8
.n[zacute]8
.n[zdotaccent]8
.n8
.na2d2
.na2j
.na3[cacute]2
.na3[lstroke]2
.na3[sacute]2
.na3[zacute]2
.na3[zdotaccent]2
.na3b2
.na3c2
.na3d[aogonek]
.na3d[eogonek]
.na3d[zacute]2
.na3d4[lstroke]ub
.na3d4ir
.na3d4much
.na3d4r[eogonek]cz
.na3d4r2w
.na3d4repcz
.na3d4rept
.na3d4ruk
.na3d4rz
.na3d4worn
.na3daj
.na3de
.na3do
.na3dy
.na3dzi
.na3f2
.na3g2
.na3h2
.na3j[aogonek]
.na3j[eogonek]
.na3jazd
.na3je
.na3k2
.na3l2
.na3m2
.na3p2
.na3r2
.na3s2
.na3t2
.na3u2
.na3w2
.na3z2
.na4d3o2b2[lstroke]
.na4d3o2bojcz
.na4d3o2bowi
.na4d3o2brot
.na4d3o2drz
.na4d3o2kien
.na4d3olbrz
.na4d5rz[aogonek]
.na4d5rz[eogonek]
.na4d5rzecz
.na4d5rzy
.na4d5ziem
.na4f3c
.na4f3t
.na4j3e2f
.na4j3e2g
.na4j3e2k2s
.na4j3e2ko
.na4j3e2n
.na4j3e2r
.na4j3e2s
.na4j3e2w
.na4j3emf
.na4j3eu
.na4r3c
.na4r3d
.na4r3k
.na4r3r
.na4r3t
.nabrz2
.nach2
.nacz2
.nad[sacute]rod5ziem
.nad3[cacute]2
.nad3[lstroke]2
.nad3[sacute]2
.nad3b2
.nad3c2
.nad3d2
.nad3e2tat
.nad3f2
.nad3g2
.nad3h2
.nad3i2
.nad3j2
.nad3k2
.nad3l2
.nad3m2
.nad3n2
.nad3p2
.nad3r2
.nad3s2
.nad3t2
.nad3u2
.nad3w2
.nad5[zdotaccent]2
.nad5z[oacute]
.nad5z2mys
.nad5zo
.nad5zwycz
.nadch2
.nadcz2
.nadd[zacute]2
.nade3[cacute]2
.nade3[lstroke]2
.nade3[sacute]2
.nade3[zacute]2
.nade3[zdotaccent]2
.nade3b2
.nade3c2
.nade3d2
.nade3f2
.nade3g2
.nade3h2
.nade3k2
.nade3l2
.nade3m2
.nade3p2
.nade3r2
.nade3s2
.nade3t2
.nade3w2
.nade3z2
.nade4p3c
.nade4p3n
.nade4p3t
.nadech2
.nadecz2
.naded[zacute]2
.naded[zdotaccent]2
.nadedz2
.nader[zdotaccent]2
.naderz2
.nadesz2
.nadsz2
.nadtr2
.nadz2
.nagrz2
.naj3[cacute]2
.naj3[lstroke]2
.naj3[sacute]2
.naj3[zacute]2
.naj3[zdotaccent]2
.naj3akt
.naj3au
.naj3b2
.naj3c2
.naj3d2
.naj3f2
.naj3g2
.naj3h2
.naj3i2
.naj3k2
.naj3l2
.naj3m2
.naj3o2
.naj3o2[cacute]2
.naj3o2[lstroke]2
.naj3o2[sacute]2
.naj3o2[zacute]2
.naj3o2[zdotaccent]2
.naj3o2b2
.naj3o2c2
.naj3o2d2
.naj3o2f2
.naj3o2g2
.naj3o2h2
.naj3o2k2
.naj3o2l2
.naj3o2m2
.naj3o2p2
.naj3o2r2
.naj3o2s2
.naj3o2t2
.naj3o2w2
.naj3o2z2
.naj3p2
.naj3r2
.naj3ro2z3
.naj3s2
.naj3t2
.naj3u2
.naj3w2
.naj3z2
.najbe2z3
.najbezw2
.najch2
.najcz2
.najd[zacute]2
.najd[zdotaccent]2
.najdo3[cacute]2
.najdo3[lstroke]2
.najdo3[sacute]2
.najdo3[zacute]2
.najdo3[zdotaccent]2
.najdo3b2
.najdo3c2
.najdo3d2
.najdo3f2
.najdo3g2
.najdo3h2
.najdo3k2
.najdo3l2
.najdo3m2
.najdo3p2
.najdo3r2
.najdo3s2
.najdo3t2
.najdo3w2
.najdo3z2
.najdoch2
.najdocz2
.najdod[zacute]2
.najdod[zdotaccent]2
.najdodz2
.najdorz2
.najdosz2
.najdotk2
.najdz2
.najkr2
.najob3[cacute]2
.najob3[lstroke]2
.najob3[sacute]2
.najob3[zacute]2
.najob3[zdotaccent]2
.najob3c2
.najob3d2
.najob3f2
.najob3g2
.najob3h2
.najob3j2
.najob3k2
.najob3l2
.najob3m2
.najob3n2
.najob3p2
.najob3s2
.najob3t2
.najob3w2
.najobch2
.najobcz2
.najobd[zacute]2
.najobd[zdotaccent]2
.najobdz2
.najobrz2
.najobsz2
.najoch2
.najocz2
.najod[zacute]2
.najod3[cacute]2
.najod3[sacute]2
.najod3c2
.najod3d2
.najod3f2
.najod3g2
.najod3h2
.najod3j2
.najod3k2
.najod3l2
.najod3m2
.najod3n2
.najod3p2
.najod3s2
.najod3t2
.najod3w2
.najod5[zdotaccent]2
.najodch2
.najodcz2
.najodd[zacute]2
.najodd[zdotaccent]2
.najoddz2
.najodsz2
.najodz2
.najorz2
.najosz2
.najro3z4u
.najrz2
.najsm2
.najsz2
.najtk2
.najtr2
.najucz2
.najzw2
.nakr2
.napo2d2
.napo3[cacute]2
.napo3[lstroke]2
.napo3[sacute]2
.napo3[zacute]2
.napo3[zdotaccent]2
.napo3b2
.napo3c2
.napo3f2
.napo3g2
.napo3h2
.napo3k2
.napo3l2
.napo3m2
.napo3p2
.napo3r2
.napo3s2
.napo3t2
.napo3w2
.napo3z2
.napo4m3p
.napoch2
.napocz2
.napod[zacute]2
.napod[zdotaccent]2
.napod3d
.napomk2
.naporz2
.naposz2
.naprz2
.nar[zdotaccent]2
.naro2z3
.narz2
.nasm2
.nasz2
.natch2
.natk2
.naz3m2
.nazw2
.nb8
.nc8
.nd8
.ne2o3
.nf8
.ng8
.nh8
.nie3[cacute]2
.nie3[lstroke]2
.nie3[sacute]2
.nie3[zacute]2
.nie3[zdotaccent]2
.nie3b2
.nie3c2
.nie3d2
.nie3f2
.nie3g2
.nie3h2
.nie3k2
.nie3l2
.nie3m2
.nie3p2
.nie3r2
.nie3s2
.nie3t2
.nie3u2
.nie3w2
.nie3z2
.nie4c3c
.nie4c3k
.nie4d[zacute]3
.nie4m3c
.nie4m3k
.niech2
.niecz2
.nied[zdotaccent]2
.niedo3[cacute]2
.niedo3[lstroke]2
.niedo3[sacute]2
.niedo3[zacute]2
.niedo3[zdotaccent]2
.niedo3b2
.niedo3c2
.niedo3d2
.niedo3f2
.niedo3g2
.niedo3h2
.niedo3k2
.niedo3l2
.niedo3m2
.niedo3p2
.niedo3r2
.niedo3s2
.niedo3t2
.niedo3w2
.niedo3z2
.niedobrz2
.niedoch2
.niedocz2
.niedod[zacute]2
.niedod[zdotaccent]2
.niedodz2
.niedokr2
.niedomk2
.niedopch2
.niedorz2
.niedosz2
.niedotk2
.niedz2
.nieo[cacute]2
.nieo[lstroke]2
.nieo[sacute]2
.nieo[zacute]2
.nieo[zdotaccent]2
.nieo2
.nieob2
.nieob3[cacute]2
.nieob3[sacute]2
.nieob3[zacute]2
.nieob3[zdotaccent]2
.nieob3c2
.nieob3d2
.nieob3f2
.nieob3g2
.nieob3h2
.nieob3j2
.nieob3k2
.nieob3m2
.nieob3p2
.nieob3s2
.nieob3w2
.nieobch2
.nieobcz2
.nieobd[zacute]2
.nieobd[zdotaccent]2
.nieobdz2
.nieobsz2
.nieoc2
.nieoch2
.nieocz2
.nieod[zacute]2
.nieod2
.nieod3[cacute]2
.nieod3[lstroke]2
.nieod3[sacute]2
.nieod3c2
.nieod3d2
.nieod3f2
.nieod3g2
.nieod3h2
.nieod3j2
.nieod3k2
.nieod3l2
.nieod3n2
.nieod3p2
.nieod3s2
.nieod3t2
.nieod3wr
.nieod5[zdotaccent]2
.nieodch2
.nieodcz2
.nieodd[zacute]2
.nieodd[zdotaccent]2
.nieoddz2
.nieodsz2
.nieodw2
.nieodz2
.nieof2
.nieog2
.nieoh2
.nieok2
.nieol2
.nieom2
.nieop2
.nieor2
.nieorz2
.nieos2
.nieosz2
.nieot2
.nieow2
.nieoz2
.niepo2d2
.niepo3[cacute]2
.niepo3[lstroke]2
.niepo3[sacute]2
.niepo3[zacute]2
.niepo3[zdotaccent]2
.niepo3b2
.niepo3c2
.niepo3d[zacute]2
.niepo3d4[lstroke]u
.niepo3d4much
.niepo3d4r[eogonek]cz
.niepo3d4ra[zdotaccent]
.niepo3d4rap
.niepo3d4repcz
.niepo3d4rept
.niepo3d4waj
.niepo3d4woj
.niepo3do
.niepo3du
.niepo3dz2
.niepo3f2
.niepo3g2
.niepo3h2
.niepo3k2
.niepo3l2
.niepo3m2
.niepo3p2
.niepo3r2
.niepo3s2
.niepo3t2
.niepo3w2
.niepo3z2
.niepo4d3o2choc
.niepo4d3o2strz
.niepoch2
.niepocz2
.niepod3[cacute]2
